Utah statutes.
51-9-502.   Definitions.

As used in this part:

(1)  "Liability or obligation" includes only an action specifically approved by the majority of the repealed board of trustees in a meeting of the repealed board of trustees.

(2)  "Related assets and liabilities" means the assets, liabilities, and obligations of the repealed Navajo Trust Fund as of June 30, 2008.

(3)  "Repealed board of trustees" means the board of trustees appointed under Title 63, Chapter 88, Navajo Trust Fund, repealed under Title 63I, Chapter 1, Legislative Oversight and Sunset Act.

(4)  "Repealed Dineh Committee" means the Dineh Committee established under Title 63, Chapter 88, Navajo Trust Fund, repealed under Title 63I, Chapter 1, Legislative Oversight and Sunset Act.

(5)  "Repealed Navajo Trust Fund" means the Navajo Trust Fund established under Title 63, Chapter 88, Navajo Trust Fund, repealed under Title 63I, Chapter 1, Legislative Oversight and Sunset Act.

(6)  "Repealed trust administrator" means the trust administrator appointed under Title 63, Chapter 88, Navajo Trust Fund, repealed under Title 63I, Chapter 1, Legislative Oversight and Sunset Act.

(7)  "Utah Navajo royalties" means the revenues received by the state that represent the 37-1/2% of the net oil royalties from the Aneth Extension of the Navajo Indian Reservation required by P.L. 72-403, 47 Stat. 1418, and P.L. 90-306, 82 Stat. 121, to be paid to the state.

